Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1207.01
Illegal water well, defined; landowner; petition for reclassification; when.

(1) Illegal water well means any water well which has not been properly decommissioned and which meets any of the following conditions:

(a) The water well is in such a condition that it cannot be placed in active or inactive status;

(b) Any necessary operating equipment has been removed and the well has not been placed in inactive status;

(c) The water well is in such a state of disrepair that continued use for the purpose for which it was constructed is impractical;

(d) The water well was constructed after October 1, 1986, but not constructed by a licensed water well contractor or by an individual on land owned by him or her and used by him or her for farming, ranching, or agricultural purposes or as his or her place of abode;

(e) The water well poses a health or safety hazard;

(f) The water well is an illegal water well in accordance with section 46-706; or

(g) The water well has been constructed after October 1, 1986, and such well is not in compliance with the standards developed under the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act.

(2) Whenever the department classifies a water well as an illegal water well, the landowner may petition the department to reclassify the water well as an active status water well, an inactive status water well, or an abandoned water well.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 76;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 98;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1149.